Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1307
Dissolution of lien; disposition of deposit.

If such judgment be affirmed, the money so deposited shall be paid to the judgment creditor, but if such judgment be reversed, the debtor may withdraw such deposit.

Laws 1893, c. 42, § 2, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 8000;

C.S.1922, § 8941;

C.S.1929, § 20-1307;

R.S.1943, § 25-1307.